Louisiana, session 2026, HB1067.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2477, 2501(B)(3) and (E), 2501.1, 2502, 2537, 2561(B)(3) and
(E), 2561.1, and 2562 are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2477. Duties of the board
A. The board shall:
(1) Represent the public interest in matters of personnel administration in the
fire and police services of the said municipal government.
(2) Advise and assist the governing body, mayor, commissioner of public
safety, and the chiefs of the fire and police departments of the municipality, with
reference to the maintenance and improvement of personnel standards and
administration in the fire and police services, and the classified system.
Page 1 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
(3) Advise and assist the employees in the classified service with reference
to the maintenance, improvement, and administration of personnel matters related
to any individual or group of employees.
(4) Make, at the direction of the mayor, commissioner of public safety, chief
of either the fire or police department of the municipality, or upon the written
petition of any employee of the fire and police service or any citizen for just cause,
or upon its own motion, any investigation concerning the administration of personnel
or the compliance with the provisions of this Part in the said municipal fire and
police services; review, and modify or set aside upon its own motion, any of its
actions; take any other action which it determines to be desirable or necessary in the
public interest, or to carry out effectively the provisions and purposes of this Part.
However, any investigation requested of the board by the mayor, commissioner of
public safety, chief of either the fire or police department of the municipality, or
upon the written petition of any employee of the fire and police service or any citizen
for just cause shall be completed within sixty days of the board's receipt of the
request for an investigation or receipt of a written petition of any employee of the
fire and police service or citizen, or both.
(5) Conduct investigations and pass upon complaints by or against any
officer or employee in the classified service for the purpose of demotion, reduction
in position or abolition thereof, suspension or dismissal of the officer or employee,
in accordance with the provisions of this Part. Investigations conducted pursuant to
the provisions of this Paragraph shall be completed within sixty days. However, the
sixty-day limitation shall not apply to any investigation conducted pursuant to the
provisions of Subpart H of Part II of Chapter 4 of this Title, comprised of R.S.
33:2181 et seq.
(6) Hear and pass upon matters which the mayor, commissioner of public
safety, the chiefs of the departments affected by this Part, and the state examiner of
municipal fire and police civil service bring before it.
Page 2 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
(7) Make, alter, amend, and promulgate rules necessary to carry out
effectively the provisions of this Part.
(8) Adopt and maintain a classification plan. The classification plan shall
be adopted and maintained by rules of the board.
(9) Make reports to the governing body, either upon its own motion or upon
the official request of the governing body, regarding general or special matters of
personnel administration in and for the municipal fire and police services of the
municipality, or with reference to any appropriation made by the governing body for
the expenses incidental to the operation of the board.
(10) Serve as a grievance body for matters arising within the fire and police
service, including but not limited to employee complaints, pay disputes and
disparities, working conditions and assignments, and departmental policies and
practices. The board shall issue written findings of fact and conclusions and shall
order corrective action where warranted. The court of original jurisdiction shall
maintain concurrent jurisdiction over matters arising under this Paragraph.
(11) Award reasonable attorney fees and costs only to an employee in the
fire and police service who prevails before the board.
B. Any investigation conducted pursuant to this Section shall be completed
within sixty days unless extended for documented reasons, shall result in written
findings and conclusions, and shall include corrective action where warranted.
Failure of the board to act, to complete an investigation, or to enforce its authority
shall constitute a final, appealable action under R.S. 33:2501(E).
C. Any legal advice, guidance, or discussion provided by the board's attorney
to the board regarding any matter pending or reasonably anticipated to come before
the board shall occur only during a properly noticed open public meeting. Executive
session shall not be used to circumvent the provisions of this Subsection. Any
communication by the board's attorney with one or more board members concerning
any such matter outside of a properly noticed public meeting is prohibited. Any
Page 3 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
attorney who violates the provisions of this Subsection shall be removed and shall
be ineligible for reappointment as a board attorney in any jurisdiction.
* * *
§2501. Appeals by employees to the board
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) The board shall have complete charge of any such hearing and
investigation, and may conduct it in any manner it deems advisable, without
prejudice to any person or party thereto. The procedure followed shall be informal
and not necessarily bound by the legalistic rules of evidence.; provided however,
proceedings shall comply with minimum standards of due process, including the
right of any employee impacted in the matter before the board to present evidence,
call witnesses, cross-examine witnesses, and compel attendance of witnesses and
production of evidence through subpoena, and shall provide for the disclosure of all
evidence to parties of record. The board shall not be required to have the testimony
taken and transcribed, but either the employee or the appointing authority may, at
their own expense, make the necessary arrangements therefor. In such cases the
board may name any competent shorthand reporter as the official reporter. If the
testimony is not taken or transcribed, then the board shall make a written finding of
fact.
* * *
E.(1) Any employee under in the classified service and any appointing
authority may appeal from any decision of the board, or from any action taken by the
board under the provisions of the Part that is prejudicial to the employee or
appointing authority. or any action or failure to act by the board, including
petitioners under R.S. 33:2477, when any such decision, action, or inaction is alleged
to be prejudicial, arbitrary, capricious, in bad faith, or not in compliance with the
Page 4 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
provisions of this Part. This appeal shall lie direct to the court of original and
unlimited jurisdiction in civil suits of the parish wherein the board is domiciled.
(2) The appeal shall be taken by serving the board, within thirty days after
entry of its decision, a written notice of the appeal, stating the grounds thereof and
demanding that a certified transcript of the record, or written findings of facts, and
all papers on file in the office of the board affecting or relating to such decision, be
filed with the designated court action, or inaction be filed with the designated court;
provided however, if the appeal is based on a failure to act, such appeal shall be
taken within thirty days after the board fails to act within the time required by law
or within a reasonable time. The board shall, within ten days, after the filing of the
notice of appeal, make, certify, and file the complete transcript with the designated
court, or, in the absence of a completed record, certify all pleadings, filings,
subpoena requests, and other documents demonstrating the board's action or failure
to act, and that court shall thereupon proceed to hear and determine the appeal in a
summary manner.
(3) This hearing shall be confined to the determination of whether the
decision made by the board was made in good faith for cause under the provisions
of this Part. No appeal to the court shall be taken except upon these grounds and
except as provided in Subsection D of this Section., whether the board failed to act
when required by law, whether the action or inaction was arbitrary, capricious, or in
bad faith, including failure to enforce lawful subpoenas or allow the development of
a complete record, or whether a board member failed to recuse himself in accordance
with Subsection D of this Section. No appeal to the court shall be taken except upon
these grounds; provided however, this Subsection shall be liberally construed in
favor of the right to appeal.
§2501.1. Authorization for awarding attorney fees
A. When an appeal is taken by an employee in the classified service pursuant
to R.S. 33:2501 to a municipal fire and police civil service board and the board
determines, in reversing the decision of the appointing authority, that the corrective
Page 5 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
or disciplinary action taken by the appointing authority was without just cause as
provided in R.S. 33:2501, the board may shall award to the appealing employee
attorney fees to be assessed against the appointing authority not to exceed five
thousand dollars in any one appeal.
B. When an appeal is taken to the district or appellate court, the court shall
award reasonable attorney fees and costs to any classified employee who prevails in
whole or in part on appeal. Such awards shall be mandatory. No attorney fees shall
be assessed against a classified employee.
§2502. Oath, testimony, production of records; refusal to testify
A. The board, and each of its members, shall have the same power and
authority to administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and compel the production of
books and papers pertinent to any investigation or hearing authorized by this Part as
is possessed by the district courts of Louisiana. Any person who (1) fails to appear
in response to a subpoena, (2) fails to answer any question, except those which may
incriminate him, (3) fails to produce any books or papers pertinent to any
investigation or hearing, or (4) knowingly gives false testimony therein shall be
subject to the penal Sections of this Part. In case of contumacy or refusal to obey a
subpoena issued to any person, the district court within the jurisdiction of which the
investigation is being carried on, or within the jurisdiction of which the person guilty
of contumacy or refusal to obey is found, or resides, or transacts business, upon
application of the board, shall have the requisite jurisdiction, upon application by the
board or any party to the proceeding, to issue to the person an order requiring him
to appear before the board, its member or agent, and to produce the required
evidence or give testimony touching the matter under consideration or in question.
Any party to the proceeding before the board, including any employee, appointing
authority, petitioner, or board member, may apply to such court for enforcement of
any subpoena issued pursuant to this Section. Any person failing to obey such order
may be punished by the court for contempt. The board shall not proceed to a final
decision until any subpoena enforcement proceeding has been resolved by the court,
Page 6 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
and any action taken in violation of this requirement shall be subject to appeal
pursuant to R.S. 33:2501(E). The board hearing shall be continued until the court
has issued a final ruling on such enforcement.
B. Any officer or employee in the classified service who wilfully refuses or
fails to appear before any court, officer, board, body, or person properly authorized
to conduct any hearing or inquiry, or any employee or officer, who, having appeared,
refuses to testify or answer any relevant question relating to the affairs of
government of the municipality or the conduct of any municipal officer or employee,
except upon the ground that his testimony or answers would incriminate him, shall,
in addition to any other penalty to which he may be subject, forfeit his position, and
shall not be eligible for appointment to any position in the classified service for a
period of six years.
* * *
§2537. Duties of the board
A. The board shall:
(1) Represent the public interest in matters of personnel administration in the
fire and police service of the municipal government, or parish government, or fire
protection district government of which the fire service is a part.
(2) Advise and assist the governing body, mayor, commissioner of public
safety and the chief of the fire department of the municipality, or the parish
governing authority, or fire protection district, governing authority, as the case may
be, with reference to the maintenance and improvement of personnel standards and
administration in the fire and police service, and the classified system.
(3) Advise and assist the employees in the classified service with reference
to the maintenance, improvement and administration of personnel matters related to
any individual or group of employees.
(4) Make, at the direction of the mayor, commissioner of public safety, chief
of either the fire or police department of the municipality, or president of the parish
governing authority, or chairman of the board of commissioners of the fire protection
Page 7 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
district, or upon the written petition of any employee of the fire and police service
or any citizen for just cause or upon its own motion, any investigation concerning the
administration of personnel or the compliance with the provisions of this Part in the
fire and police service; review and modify or set aside, upon its own motion, any of
its actions, and take any other action which it determines to be desirable or necessary
in the public interest or to carry out effectively the provisions and purposes of this
Part. However, any investigation requested of the board by the mayor, commissioner
of public safety, chief of either the fire or police department of the municipality, or
president of the parish governing authority, or chairman of the board of
commissioners of the fire protection district, or upon the written petition of any
employee of the fire and police service or any citizen for just cause shall be
completed within sixty days of the receipt of the request for an investigation or
receipt of a written petition of any employee of the fire and police service or citizen,
or both.
(5) Conduct investigations and pass upon complaints by or against any
officer or employee in the classified service for the purpose of demotion, reduction
in position or abolition thereof, suspension, or dismissal of the officer or employee,
in accordance with the provisions of this Part. Investigations conducted pursuant to
the provisions of this Paragraph shall be completed within sixty days. However, the
sixty-day limitation shall not apply to any investigation conducted pursuant to the
provisions of Subpart H of Part II of Chapter 4 of this Title, comprised of R.S.
33:2181 et seq.
(6) Hear and pass upon matters which the mayor, commissioner of public
safety, the chief of the fire or police departments of the municipality, or any member
of the parish or fire protection district governing authority or the state examiner of
fire and police civil service brings before it.
(7) Make, alter, amend and promulgate rules necessary to carry out
effectively the provisions of this Part.
Page 8 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
(8) Adopt and maintain a classification plan. The classification plan shall
be adopted and maintained by rules of the board.
(9) Make reports to the governing body, either upon its own motion or upon
the official request of the governing body, regarding general or special matters of
personnel administration in and for the fire or police service of the municipality,
parish or fire protection district, as the case may be, or with reference to any
appropriation made by the governing body for the expenses incidental to the
operation of the board.
(10) Serve as a grievance body for matters arising within the fire and police
service, including but not limited to employee complaints, pay disputes and
disparities, working conditions and assignments, and departmental policies and
practices. The board shall issue written findings of fact and conclusions and shall
order corrective action where warranted. The court of original jurisdiction shall
maintain concurrent jurisdiction over matters arising under this Paragraph.
(11) Award reasonable attorney fees and costs only to an employee in the
fire and police service who prevails before the board.
B. Any investigation conducted pursuant to this Section shall be completed
within sixty days unless extended for documented reasons, shall result in written
findings and conclusions, and shall include corrective action where warranted.
Failure of the board to act, to complete an investigation, or to enforce its authority
shall constitute a final, appealable action under R.S. 33:2561(E).
C. Any legal advice, guidance, or discussion provided by the board's attorney
to the board regarding any matter pending or reasonably anticipated to come before
the board shall occur only during a properly noticed open public meeting. Executive
session shall not be used to circumvent the provisions of this Subsection. Any
communication by the board's attorney with one or more board members concerning
any such matter outside of a properly noticed public meeting is prohibited. Any
Page 9 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
attorney who violates the provisions of this Subsection shall be removed and shall
be ineligible for reappointment as a board attorney in any jurisdiction.
* * *
§2561. Appeals by employees to the board
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) The board shall have complete charge of any such hearing and
investigation and may conduct it in any manner it deems advisable, without prejudice
to any person or party thereto. The procedure followed shall be informal and not
necessarily bound by the legalistic rules of evidence.; provided however, proceedings
shall comply with minimum standards of due process, including the right of any
employee impacted in the matter before the board to present evidence, call witnesses,
cross-examine witnesses, and compel attendance of witnesses and production of
evidence through subpoena, and shall provide for the disclosure of all evidence to
parties of record. The board shall not be required to have the testimony taken and
transcribed, but either the employee or the appointing authority may, at their own
expense, make the necessary arrangements therefor. In such cases, the board may
name any competent shorthand reporter as the official reporter. If the testimony is
not taken or transcribed, then the board shall make a written finding of fact.
* * *
E. Any employee under in the classified service and any appointing authority
may appeal from any decision of the board or from any action taken by the board
under the provisions of this Part which is prejudicial to the employee or appointing
authority any action or failure to act by the board, including petitioners under R.S.
33:2537, when any such decision, action, or inaction is alleged to be prejudicial,
arbitrary, capricious, in bad faith, or not in compliance with the provisions of this
Part. This appeal shall lie direct to the court of original and unlimited jurisdiction
in civil suits of the parish wherein the board is domiciled. This appeal shall be taken
Page 10 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
by serving the board, within thirty days after entry of its decision, a written notice
of appeal stating the grounds thereof and demanding that a certified transcript of the
record or written findings of fact and all papers on file in the office of the board
affecting or relating to such decisions be filed with the designated court, actions, or
inaction be filed with the designated court; provided however, if the appeal is based
on a failure to act, such appeal shall be taken within thirty days after the board fails
to act within the time required by law or within a reasonable time. The board shall,
within ten days after the filing of the notice of appeal, make, certify, and file the
complete transcript with the designated court, or, in the absence of a completed
record, certify all pleadings, filings, subpoena requests, and other documents
demonstrating the board's action or failure to act, and that court thereupon shall
proceed to hear and determine the appeal in a summary manner. This hearing shall
be confined to the determination of whether the decision made by the board was
made in good faith for cause under the provisions of this Part or to whether a board
member should have or failed to recuse himself in accordance with Subsection D of
this Section. No appeal to the court shall be taken except upon these grounds.,
whether the board failed to act when required by law, whether the action or inaction
was arbitrary, capricious, or in bad faith, including failure to enforce lawful
subpoenas or allow the development of a complete record, or whether a board
member failed to recuse himself in accordance with Subsection D of this Section. No
appeal to the court shall be taken except upon these grounds; provided however, this
Subsection shall be liberally construed in favor of the right to appeal.
§2561.1. Authorization for awarding attorney fees
A. When an appeal is taken by an employee in the classified service pursuant
to R.S. 33:2561 to a municipal, parish, or fire protection district fire and police civil
service board and the board determines, in reversing the decision of the appointing
authority, that the corrective or disciplinary action taken by the appointing authority
was without just cause as provided in R.S. 33:2561, the board may shall award to the
Page 11 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
appealing employee attorney fees to be assessed against the appointing authority not
to exceed five thousand dollars in any one appeal.
B. When an appeal is taken to the district or appellate court, the court shall
award reasonable attorney fees and costs to any classified employee who prevails in
whole or in part on appeal. Such awards shall be mandatory. No attorney fees shall
be assessed against a classified employee.
§2562. Oath, testimony, production of records; refusal to testify
A. Each member of the board shall have the same power and authority to
administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and compel the production of books and papers
pertinent to any investigation or hearing authorized by this Part as is possessed by
the district courts of Louisiana. Any person who (1) fails to appear in response to
a subpoena, (2) fails to answer any question, except those which may tend to
incriminate him, (3) fails to produce any books or papers pertinent to any
investigation or hearing, or (4) knowingly gives false testimony therein shall be
subject to the penal provisions of this Part. In case of contumacy or refusal to obey
a subpoena issued to any person, the district court within the jurisdiction of which
the investigation is being carried on, or within the jurisdiction of which the person
guilty of contumacy or refusal to obey is found, or resides, or transacts business,
upon application of the board, shall have the requisite jurisdiction, upon application
by the board or any party to the proceeding, to issue to the person an order requiring
him to appear before the board, its member or agent, and to produce the required
evidence or give testimony touching the matter under consideration or in question.
Any party to the proceeding before the board, including any employee, appointing
authority, petitioner, or board member, may apply to such court for enforcement of
any subpoena issued pursuant to this Section. Any person failing to obey such order
may be punished by the court for contempt. The board shall not proceed to a final
decision until any subpoena enforcement proceeding has been resolved by the court
and any action taken in violation of this requirement shall be subject to appeal
Page 12 of 16
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2219 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1067
pursuant to R.S. 33:2561(E). The board hearing shall be continued until the court
has issued a final ruling on such enforcement.
B. Any officer or employee in the classified service who wilfully refuses or
fails to appear before any court, officer, board, body or person properly authorized
to conduct any hearing or inquiry, or any employee or officer who, having appeared,
refuses to testify or answer any relevant question relating to the affairs of
government of the municipality, parish or fire protection district or the conduct of
any officer or employee thereof, except upon the ground that his testimony or
answers would tend to incriminate him, shall, in addition to any other penalty to
which he may be subject, forfeit his position, and shall not be eligible for
appointment to any position in the classified service for a period of six years.